Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-109
Commissioners and employees; bonds or insurance.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each commissioner shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. Employees of the commission who are accountable for public funds shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201 to secure the safety of such funds. The premium shall be paid by the State of Nebraska out of the General Fund. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, the executive director of the commission shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 10, p. 380;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-310;

R.S.1943, § 53-109;

Laws 1953, c. 180, § 1, p. 569;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 25.

Bond required of member of Liquor Control Commission is different than that required of head of executive department. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).